kk_KZ/kk_KZ.aff
SFX d N 54
SFX d 0 дарың [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX d 0 дарың [аоуұыэ]з
SFX d 0 дарың [аоуұыэ]л
SFX d 0 дарың [аоуұыэ]м
SFX d 0 дарың [аоуұыэ]н
SFX d 0 дарың [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX d 0 дерің [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX d 0 дерің [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX d 0 дерің [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX d 0 дерің [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX d 0 дерің [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX d 0 дерің [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX d 0 ларың [аоуұыэ]
SFX d 0 ларың [аоуұыэ]й
SFX d 0 ларың [аоуұыэ]р
SFX d 0 ларың [аоуұыэ]у
SFX d 0 лерің [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX d 0 лерің [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX d 0 лерің [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX d 0 лерің [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]б
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]в
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]г
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]д
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]к
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]п
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]с
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]т
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]х
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX d 0 тарың [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX d 0 терің [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX E N 55
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX E 0 іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX E 0 ңіз [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX E 0 ңыз [аоұыэ]
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]б
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]в
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]г
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]д
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]з
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]й
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]к
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]л
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]м
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]н
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]п
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]р
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]с
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]т
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоұыэ]у
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]х
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX E 0 ыңыз [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX E 0 ыңыз у
SFX e N 54
SFX e 0 дарыңыз [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX e 0 дарыңыз [аоуұыэ]з
SFX e 0 дарыңыз [аоуұыэ]л
SFX e 0 дарыңыз [аоуұыэ]м
SFX e 0 дарыңыз [аоуұыэ]н
SFX e 0 дарыңыз [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX e 0 деріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX e 0 деріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX e 0 деріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX e 0 деріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX e 0 деріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX e 0 деріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX e 0 ларыңыз [аоуұыэ]
SFX e 0 ларыңыз [аоуұыэ]й
SFX e 0 ларыңыз [аоуұыэ]р
SFX e 0 ларыңыз [аоуұыэ]у
SFX e 0 леріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX e 0 леріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX e 0 леріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX e 0 леріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]б
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]в
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]г
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]д
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]к
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]п
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]с
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]т
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]х
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX e 0 тарыңыз [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX e 0 теріңіз [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX F N 55
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX F 0 і [әеёиөүіюя]щ
SFX F 0 сі [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX F 0 сы [аоұыэ]
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]б
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]в
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]г
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]д
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]з
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]й
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]к
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]л
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]м
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]н
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]п
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]р
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]с
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]т
SFX F 0 ы [аоұыэ]у
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]х
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX F 0 ы [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX F 0 ы у
SFX f N 54
SFX f 0 дары [аоуұыэ]ж
SFX f 0 дары [аоуұыэ]з
SFX f 0 дары [аоуұыэ]л
SFX f 0 дары [аоуұыэ]м
SFX f 0 дары [аоуұыэ]н
SFX f 0 дары [аоуұыэ]ң
SFX f 0 дері [әеёиөүіюя]ж
SFX f 0 дері [әеёиөүіюя]з
SFX f 0 дері [әеёиөүіюя]л
SFX f 0 дері [әеёиөүіюя]м
SFX f 0 дері [әеёиөүіюя]н
SFX f 0 дері [әеёиөүіюя]ң
SFX f 0 лары [аоуұыэ]
SFX f 0 лары [аоуұыэ]й
SFX f 0 лары [аоуұыэ]р
SFX f 0 лары [аоуұыэ]у
SFX f 0 лері [әеёиөүіюя]
SFX f 0 лері [әеёиөүіюя]й
SFX f 0 лері [әеёиөүіюя]р
SFX f 0 лері [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]б
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]в
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]г
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]ғ
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]д
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]к
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]қ
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]һ
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]п
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]с
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]т
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]ф
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]х
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]ц
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]ч
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]ш
SFX f 0 тары [аоуұыэ]щ
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]б
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]в
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]г
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]ғ
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]д
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]к
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]қ
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]һ
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]п
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]с
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]т
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]ф
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]х
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]ц
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]ч
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]ш
SFX f 0 тері [әеёиөүіюя]щ
