kk_KZ/kk_KZ.dic
азаматтар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
айтылды/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
алабұға/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
алулар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
анықтама/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
арманшыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
астын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
атқарылуына/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
африка/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ақаң/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
аңыра/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
байқұн/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
барылдат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
баулын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бақылдат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
белгілер/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бике/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
болым/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
будала/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
білген/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бүгежектет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бұлардың/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бұқ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бөлімшесі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
гектарла/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
гүлсабақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
даусың/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
депонент/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
долылан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
діңгектей/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
дәнекерлеуші/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ез/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
еместерінен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ермей/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
есімше/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жадыра/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жалдас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жаны/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жасалғаннан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жағдайларды/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
желк/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жеңсікті/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жонғыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жылмит/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жіпсілең/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жұлмала/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жөнімді/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
зерттеушілер/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
изеп/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
иісі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кездегі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
келісімде/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кескіндес/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
киносеанс/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
конференц/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кіржің/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
күйіркелес/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
күреңот/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
көбейтінді/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
көлгірлен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
көрсетті/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
латунь/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
лөк/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
малшы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мастоидит/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мебельдеттір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
меруертгүл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мо/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мылжың/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мүк/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мұқыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мөлтілдеттір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
нақсүйер/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
нысапсыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ойбай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
он/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ортан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ошарлы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
пакеті/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
перегон/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
пристань/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
пөже/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
резервуар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
роталас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
саласында/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
санкция/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сатын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
саңғырлат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
серек/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
содан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
социализм/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
суреткер/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сымпыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сыңғырлас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сүргекте/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сәлемшөп/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
табыншы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
талғампаздан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
таралуынан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тасыраң/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
таңыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тергеусіз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тоздан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
топаз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тотықтан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
трап/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тыйылыс/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тыстал/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тізілімі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тіркелгеннен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түйетайлыла/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түнсәуле/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түсіңкі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тұрақтан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тұғырына/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
төзімпаз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
төтеннен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
фактуралар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
фрагментті/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
центнерле/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шалымды/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шартит/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шақты/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шертер/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шквал/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шоқырақта/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шынғырла/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шілтеле/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шәлекей/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ыржалақтат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ыңғайластырыл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ілгіштен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ғанимет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қадис/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қайнаң/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қалаш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қамбашы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қаптыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қараңғы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қарғап/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қатынасқа/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қашаңдас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қаңсыла/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қиғылат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қойқақта/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қорасына/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қотанда/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қуыспақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қылша/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қырыстыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
құбылыстардың/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
құмар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
құрылысқа/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
үйреніл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
үргіздір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ұйпат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ұсақсын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
әдебиеттегі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
әлеумет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
әурелен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
өлшемелі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
өтін/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
Жангали/BbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
